Texas, session 892, HB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Sections 141.0091, 141.021, and 141.022 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  FLOOD SAFETY REQUIREMENTS. (a) This section does not apply to a youth camp subject to a flood plan as designated under state or federal law. (b)  A youth camp operator shall for each youth camp cabin used as an overnight accommodation for campers provide: (1)  a life jacket for each camper assigned to the cabin; and (2)  life rafts with sufficient capacity to support the maximum number of campers that may be assigned to the cabin. (c)  The department shall monitor youth camps for compliance with this section and post reports of noncompliance on the department's Internet website. Sec. 141.021.  STUDY ON COST OF LIFE JACKETS AND LIFE RAFTS FOR YOUTH CAMPS. (a) The department shall conduct a study on the cost of providing youth camp cabins with: (1)  a life jacket for each camper assigned to the cabin; and (2)  life rafts with sufficient capacity to support the maximum number of campers that may be assigned to the cabin. (b)  This section expires September 1, 2027. Sec. 141.022.  SAFETY MEASURE STATE GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The department shall establish a program to award grants to cover 50 percent of the costs incurred by a youth camp operator to equip each youth camp cabin with: (1)  a life jacket for each camper assigned to the cabin; and (2)  life rafts with sufficient capacity to support the maximum number of campers that may be assigned to the cabin. (b)  The legislature shall appropriate $10 million for the grant program established under this section. (c)  This section expires September 1, 2031. SECTION 2.  Notwithstanding Section 141.0091, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act, a youth camp operator who is operating a youth camp on the effective date of this Act is not required to comply with the requirements of that section until January 1, 2029. SECTION 3.  The Department of State Health Services shall complete the study required by Section 141.021, Health and Safety Code, as added by this Act, not later than April 1, 2026. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.